District of Columbia statutes.
7-2803

Prohibition of prerecorded transmittals.

Except for signaling devices jointly approved by the District of Columbia Fire Department and the Office on Aging under the Life Safety System, no person shall transmit or cause to be transmitted a prerecorded message to report any fire, burglary, holdup, or other emergency directly to the Metropolitan Police Department or the District of Columbia Fire Department by means of any telephone device, telephone attachment, alarm system, or other device. Any person violating this section shall be subject to a fine of up to $100 for each offense.

Sept. 26, 1980, D.C. Law 3-107, § 4, 27 DCR 3760
Mar. 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-99, § 2(e), 35 DCR 1051
1981 Ed., § 6-3103.